src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VINIT_aniibiish_gt-norm.yaml
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pl: odaniibiishensiniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Pl+Loc: odaniibiishensiwaang
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Pl+Obv: odaniibiishensiwaan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pl: odaniibiishensiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishenyibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishenyibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishenyibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishensibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishensibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishensibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishenyibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishenyibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishenyibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishensibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishensibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishensibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishenyibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishenyibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishenyibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishensibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishensibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishensibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: idaniibiishenyibaniing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: idaniibiishenyibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: idaniibiishenyibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: idaniibiishensibaniing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: idaniibiishensibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: idaniibiishensibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nidaniibiishimishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+21: gidaniibiishimishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gidaniibiishimishiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv: odaniibiishimishini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl: odaniibiishimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: nidaniibiishimishiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nidaniibiishimishidig, nidaniibiishimishidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: gidaniibiishimishiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gidaniibiishimishidig, gidaniibiishimishidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: odaniibiishimishiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [odaniibiishimishidig, odaniibiishimishidog]
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: idaniibiishimishiban
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [idaniibiishimishidig, idaniibiishimishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: nidaniibiishimishing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: nidaniibiishimishan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: nidaniibiishimishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: gidaniibiishimishing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: gidaniibiishimishan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: gidaniibiishimishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: odaniibiishimishing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: odaniibiishimishan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: odaniibiishimishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: idaniibiishimishing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: idaniibiishimishan
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: idaniibiishimishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nidaniibiishiminaaniban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaniibiishiminaanidig, nidaniibiishiminaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21+Pret: gidaniibiishiminaaniban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21+VocPl: [gidaniibiishiminaanidig, gidaniibiishiminaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gidaniibiishimiwaaban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaniibiishimiwaadig, gidaniibiishimiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret: odaniibiishiminiiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [odaniibiishiminiidig, odaniibiishiminiidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret: odaniibiishimiwaaban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [odaniibiishimiwaadig, odaniibiishimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nidaniibiishiminaaning
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nidaniibiishiminaanin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nidaniibiishiminaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21+Loc: gidaniibiishiminaaning
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21+Obv: gidaniibiishiminaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+21+Pl: gidaniibiishiminaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gidaniibiishimiwaang
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gidaniibiishimiwaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gidaniibiishimiwaan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv+Loc: odaniibiishiminiing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv+Obv: odaniibiishiminiin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pl: odaniibiishiminiin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl+Loc: odaniibiishimiwaang
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl+Obv: odaniibiishimiwaan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pl: odaniibiishimiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishimibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishimibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishimibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishimibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishimibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishimibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishimibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishimibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishimibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: idaniibiishimibaniing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: idaniibiishimibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: idaniibiishimibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nidaniibiishishinaaniban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nidaniibiishishinaanidig, nidaniibiishishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21+Pret: gidaniibiishishinaaniban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21+VocPl: [gidaniibiishishinaanidig, gidaniibiishishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gidaniibiishishiwaaban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gidaniibiishishiwaadig, gidaniibiishishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret: odaniibiishishiniiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [odaniibiishishiniidig, odaniibiishishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret: odaniibiishishiwaaban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [odaniibiishishiwaadig, odaniibiishishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nidaniibiishishinaaning
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nidaniibiishishinaanin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nidaniibiishishinaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21+Loc: gidaniibiishishinaaning
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21+Obv: gidaniibiishishinaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+21+Pl: gidaniibiishishinaanin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gidaniibiishishiwaang
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gidaniibiishishiwaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gidaniibiishishiwaan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv+Loc: odaniibiishishiniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv+Obv: odaniibiishishiniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pl: odaniibiishishiniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl+Loc: odaniibiishishiwaang
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl+Obv: odaniibiishishiwaan
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pl: odaniibiishishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishishibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishishibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishishibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishishibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishishibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishishibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishishibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishishibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishishibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: idaniibiishishibaniing
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: idaniibiishishibaniin
     X+aniibiish+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: idaniibiishishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nidaniibiishinaanibaniing
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nidaniibiishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nidaniibiishinaanibaniin
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nidaniibiishinaanidig, nidaniibiishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nidaniibiishinaanidig, nidaniibiishinaanidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nidaniibiishinaanidig, nidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishinaanibaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishinaanibaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishinaanidig, gidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishinaanidig, gidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+21+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishinaanidig, gidaniibiishinaanidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gidaniibiishiwaabaniing
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gidaniibiishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gidaniibiishiwaabaniin
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gidaniibiishiwaadig, gidaniibiishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gidaniibiishiwaadig, gidaniibiishiwaadog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gidaniibiishiwaadig, gidaniibiishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishiniibaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishiniibaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishiniidig, odaniibiishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishiniidig, odaniibiishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishiniidig, odaniibiishiniidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+Pret+Loc: odaniibiishiwaabaniing
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+Pret+Obv: odaniibiishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+Pret+Pl: odaniibiishiwaabaniin
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [odaniibiishiwaadig, odaniibiishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [odaniibiishiwaadig, odaniibiishiwaadog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [odaniibiishiwaadig, odaniibiishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: aniibiishenyishibaniing
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: aniibiishenyishibaniin
     aniibiish+NI+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: aniibiishenyishibaniin
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: aniibiishensishibaniing
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: aniibiishensishibaniin
     aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: aniibiishensishibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nidaniibiishenyimishinaan
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nidaniibiishensimishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gidaniibiishenyimishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gidaniibiishenyimishiwaa
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21: gidaniibiishensimishinaan
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gidaniibiishensimishiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv: odaniibiishenyimishini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl: odaniibiishenyimishiwaa
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv: odaniibiishensimishini
     3+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl: odaniibiishensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nidaniibiishenyimishiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nidaniibiishenyimishidig, nidaniibiishenyimishidog]
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nidaniibiishensimishiban
     1+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nidaniibiishensimishidig, nidaniibiishensimishidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gidaniibiishenyimishiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gidaniibiishenyimishidig, gidaniibiishenyimishidog]
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gidaniibiishensimishiban
     2+aniibiish+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gidaniibiishensimishidig, gidaniibiishensimishidog]
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: odaniibiishenyimishiban
     3+aniibiish+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [odaniibiishenyimishidig, odaniibiishenyimishidog]
